Hawaii statutes.
§842-5 Forfeiture of corporate charters and
cancellation of registrations and licenses. The attorney general may
institute civil proceedings in the circuit court to forfeit the charter of any
corporation organized under the laws of this State and to cancel the
registration and license authorizing any foreign corporation to carry on
business or charitable work in this State, when:

(1) (A) Any of the corporate officers or any
other person controlling the management or operation of the corporation, with
the knowledge of the president and a majority of the board of directors or
under circumstances wherein the president and majority of the directors should
have such knowledge, is engaged in organized crime or who is connected directly
or indirectly with organizations or criminal societies engaging in organized
crime[;] or

(B) A director, officer, employee, agent, or
stockholder acting for, through, or on behalf of a corporation, in conducting
the corporation's affairs, purposely engages in a persistent course of
organized crime with the knowledge of the president and a majority of the board
of directors or under circumstances wherein the president and a majority of the
directors should have such knowledge, with the intent to compel or induce other
persons, firms, or corporations to deal with the corporation or to engage in
organized crime; and

(2) The public interest requires the charter of the
corporation to be forfeited and the corporation to be dissolved or the
registration and license to be canceled, for the prevention of future illegal
conduct of the same character. [L 1972, c 71, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next